Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-959
Special election by mail; undeliverable ballots; removal of names.

The names of voters whose ballots are returned as undeliverable shall be subject to removal from the voter registration records as provided in sections 32-326 to 32-329.

Laws 1996, LB 964, § 12.